Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1643
Administrative or judicial recourse; not affected.

The Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act does not deprive the owner of any administrative or judicial recourse to the courts to which such owner is entitled under the laws of this state.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 43.